Missouri, session 2026, SB1053.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 213.010 and 213.111, RSMo, are
repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 213.010 and 213.111, to read as follows:
213.010. As used in this chapter, the following terms
shall mean:
(1) "Age", an age of forty or more years but less than
seventy years, except that it shall not be an unlawful
employment practice for an employer to require the
compulsory retirement of any person who has attained the age
of sixty-five and who, for the two-year period immediately
before retirement, is employed in a bona fide executive or
high policy-making position, if such person is entitled to
an immediate nonforfeitable annual retirement benefit from a
pension, profit sharing, savings or deferred compensation
plan, or any combination of such plans, of the employer,
which equals, in the aggregate, at least forty-four thousand
dollars;
(2) "Because" or "because of", as it relates to the
adverse decision or action, the protected criterion was the
motivating factor;
(3) "Commission", the Missouri commission on human
rights;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1053 2
(4) "Complainant", a person who has filed a complaint
with the commission alleging that another person has engaged
in a prohibited discriminatory practice;
(5) "Disability", a physical or mental impairment
which substantially limits one or more of a person's major
life activities, being regarded as having such an
impairment, or a record of having such an impairment, which
with or without reasonable accommodation does not interfere
with performing the job, utilizing the place of public
accommodation, or occupying the dwelling in question. For
purposes of this chapter, the term "disability" does not
include current, illegal use of or addiction to a controlled
substance as such term is defined by section 195.010;
however, a person may be considered to have a disability if
that person:
(a) Has successfully completed a supervised drug
rehabilitation program and is no longer engaging in the
illegal use of, and is not currently addicted to, a
controlled substance or has otherwise been rehabilitated
successfully and is no longer engaging in such use and is
not currently addicted;
(b) Is participating in a supervised rehabilitation
program and is no longer engaging in illegal use of
controlled substances; or
(c) Is erroneously regarded as currently illegally
using, or being addicted to, a controlled substance;
(6) "Discrimination", conduct proscribed herein, taken
because of race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry,
sex, or age as it relates to employment, disability, or
familial status as it relates to housing;
(7) "Dwelling", any building, structure or portion
thereof which is occupied as, or designed or intended for

SB 1053 3
occupancy as, a residence by one or more families, and any
vacant land which is offered for sale or lease for the
construction or location thereon of any such building,
structure or portion thereof;
(8) "Employer", a person engaged in an industry
affecting commerce who has six or more employees for each
working day in each of twenty or more calendar weeks in the
current or preceding calendar year, and shall include the
state, or any political or civil subdivision thereof, or any
person employing six or more persons within the state but
does not include corporations and associations owned or
operated by religious or sectarian organizations.
"Employer" shall not include:
(a) The United States;
(b) A corporation wholly owned by the government of
the United States;
(c) An individual employed by an employer;
(d) An Indian tribe;
(e) Any department or agency of the District of
Columbia subject by statute to procedures of the competitive
service, as defined in 5 U.S.C. Section 2101; or
(f) A bona fide private membership club, other than a
labor organization, that is exempt from taxation under 26
U.S.C. Section 501(c);
(9) "Employment agency" includes any person or agency,
public or private, regularly undertaking with or without
compensation to procure employees for an employer or to
procure for employees opportunities to work for an employer;
(10) "Executive director", the executive director of
the Missouri commission on human rights;

SB 1053 4
(11) "Familial status", one or more individuals who
have not attained the age of eighteen years being domiciled
with:
(a) A parent or another person having legal custody of
such individual; or
(b) The designee of such parent or other person having
such custody, with the written permission of such parent or
other person. The protections afforded against
discrimination because of familial status shall apply to any
person who is pregnant or is in the process of securing
legal custody of any individual who has not attained the age
of eighteen years;
(12) "Human rights fund", a fund established to
receive civil penalties as required by federal regulations
and as set forth by subdivision (2) of subsection 11 of
section 213.075, and which will be disbursed to offset
additional expenses related to compliance with the
Department of Housing and Urban Development regulations;
100 (13) "Labor organization" includes any organization
101 which exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of
102 collective bargaining or of dealing with employers
103 concerning grievances, terms or conditions of employment, or
104 for other mutual aid or protection in relation to employment;
105 (14) "Local commissions", any commission or agency
106 established prior to August 13, 1986, by an ordinance or
107 order adopted by the governing body of any city,
108 constitutional charter city, town, village, or county;
109 (15) "Person" includes one or more individuals,
110 corporations, partnerships, associations, organizations,
111 labor organizations, legal representatives, mutual
112 companies, joint stock companies, trusts, trustees, trustees

SB 1053 5
113 in bankruptcy, receivers, fiduciaries, or other organized
114 groups of persons;
115 (16) "Places of public accommodation", all places or
116 businesses offering or holding out to the general public,
117 goods, services, privileges, facilities, advantages or
118 accommodations for the peace, comfort, health, welfare and
119 safety of the general public or such public places providing
120 food, shelter, recreation and amusement, including, but not
121 limited to:
122 (a) Any inn, hotel, motel, or other establishment
123 which provides lodging to transient guests, other than an
124 establishment located within a building which contains not
125 more than five rooms for rent or hire and which is actually
126 occupied by the proprietor of such establishment as his
127 residence;
128 (b) Any restaurant, cafeteria, lunchroom, lunch
129 counter, soda fountain, or other facility principally
130 engaged in selling food for consumption on the premises,
131 including, but not limited to, any such facility located on
132 the premises of any retail establishment;
133 (c) Any gasoline station, including all facilities
134 located on the premises of such gasoline station and made
135 available to the patrons thereof;
136 (d) Any motion picture house, theater, concert hall,
137 sports arena, stadium, or other place of exhibition or
138 entertainment;
139 (e) Any public facility owned, operated, or managed by
140 or on behalf of this state or any agency or subdivision
141 thereof, or any public corporation; and any such facility
142 supported in whole or in part by public funds;
143 (f) Any establishment which is physically located
144 within the premises of any establishment otherwise covered

SB 1053 6
145 by this section or within the premises of which is
146 physically located any such covered establishment, and which
147 holds itself out as serving patrons of such covered
148 establishment;
149 (17) "Public employer", any entity for which coverage
150 is provided by section 105.711;
151 (18) "Rent" includes to lease, to sublease, to let and
152 otherwise to grant for consideration the right to occupy
153 premises not owned by the occupant;
154 [(18)] (19) "Respondent", a person who is alleged to
155 have engaged in a prohibited discriminatory practice in a
156 complaint filed with the commission;
157 [(19)] (20) "The motivating factor", the employee's
158 protected classification actually played a role in the
159 adverse action or decision and had a determinative influence
160 on the adverse decision or action;
161 [(20)] (21) "Unlawful discriminatory practice", any
162 act that is unlawful under this chapter.
213.111. 1. If, after one hundred eighty days from
the filing of a complaint alleging an unlawful
discriminatory practice pursuant to section 213.055, 213.065
or 213.070 to the extent that the alleged violation of
section 213.070 relates to or involves a violation of
section 213.055 or 213.065, or subdivision (3) of subsection
1 of section 213.070 as it relates to employment and public
accommodations, the commission has not completed its
administrative processing and the person aggrieved so
requests in writing, the commission shall issue to the
person claiming to be aggrieved a letter indicating his or
her right to bring a civil action within ninety days of such
notice against the respondent named in the complaint. If,
after the filing of a complaint pursuant to sections

SB 1053 7
213.040, 213.045, 213.050 and 213.070, to the extent that
the alleged violation of section 213.070 relates to or
involves a violation of sections 213.040, 213.045 and
213.050, or subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of section
213.070 as it relates to housing, and the person aggrieved
so requests in writing, the commission shall issue to the
person claiming to be aggrieved a letter indicating his or
her right to bring a civil action within ninety days of such
notice against the respondent named in the complaint. The
commission may not at any other time or for any other reason
issue a letter indicating a complainant's right to bring a
civil action. Such an action may be brought in any circuit
court in any county in which the unlawful discriminatory
practice is alleged to have been committed, either before a
circuit or associate circuit judge. Upon issuance of this
notice, the commission shall terminate all proceedings
relating to the complaint. No person may file or reinstate
a complaint with the commission after the issuance of a
notice under this section relating to the same practice or
act. Any action brought in court under this section shall
be filed within ninety days from the date of the
commission's notification letter to the individual but no
later than two years after the alleged cause occurred or its
reasonable discovery by the alleged injured party.
2. The court may grant as relief, as it deems
appropriate, any permanent or temporary injunction,
temporary restraining order, or other order, and may award
to the plaintiff actual and punitive damages, and in cases
not involving a public employer as one of the defendants,
the court may award court costs and reasonable attorney fees
to the prevailing party, other than a state agency or
commission or a local commission; except that, a prevailing

SB 1053 8
respondent may be awarded reasonable attorney fees only upon
a showing that the case was without foundation.
3. Any party to any action initiated under this
section has a right to a trial by jury.
4. The sum of the amount of actual damages, including
damages for future pecuniary losses, emotional pain,
suffering, inconvenience, mental anguish, loss of enjoyment
of life, and other nonpecuniary losses, and punitive damages
awarded under this section shall not exceed for each
complaining party:
(1) Actual back pay and interest on back pay; and
(2) (a) In the case of a respondent who has more than
five and fewer than one hundred one employees in each of
twenty or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding
calendar year, fifty thousand dollars;
(b) In the case of a respondent who has more than one
hundred and fewer than two hundred one employees in each of
twenty or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding
calendar year, one hundred thousand dollars;
(c) In the case of a respondent who has more than two
hundred and fewer than five hundred one employees in each of
twenty or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding
calendar year, two hundred thousand dollars; or
(d) In the case of a respondent who has more than five
hundred employees in each of twenty or more calendar weeks
in the current or preceding calendar year, five hundred
thousand dollars.
5. In any employment-related civil action brought
under this chapter, the plaintiff shall bear the burden of
proving the alleged unlawful decision or action was made or

SB 1053 9
taken because of his or her protected classification and was
the direct proximate cause of the claimed damages.
✓